Hawaii statutes.
§437B-13 Invoices; supplying crash parts or
used parts; customer's copy. All work done by a motor vehicle repair
dealer, mechanic, or apprentice, including all warranty work, shall be recorded
on an invoice and shall describe all service work done and parts supplied.
Service work and parts shall be listed separately on the invoice, which shall
also state separately the subtotal prices for service work and for parts, not
including the general excise tax, and shall state separately the tax, if any,
applicable to parts and service work. If any crash, used, rebuilt, or
reconditioned parts are supplied, the invoice shall clearly state that fact.
If a part of a component system is composed of new and used, crash, rebuilt, or
reconditioned parts, the invoice shall clearly state that fact. One copy shall
be given to the customer and one copy shall be retained by the motor vehicle
repair dealer. [L 1975, c 143, pt of §2; am L 1987, c 272, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next